District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1102.07

Reports by others than political committees and candidates.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 453, Pub. L. 93-376, title II, § 207
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1417.
1973 Ed., § 1-1137.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Emergency Legislation